Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.38
Subdivision real estate; representations that commission has inspected and approved; unlawful.

No broker or salesperson shall in any manner refer to the commission or any member or employee thereof in selling, offering for sale, or advertising or otherwise promoting the sale, mortgage, or lease of any such real estate, nor make any representation whatsoever that such real estate has been inspected or approved or otherwise passed upon by the commission or any state official, department, or employee.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 38;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 27.